Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 13

Actions by and Against State

20-13-101. Power to prosecute suits.

The state shall commence and prosecute suits according to the laws of the land, as in cases between individuals, except that no security shall, in such case, be required.

Code 1858, § 2806 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 139, § 2); Shan., § 4506; Code 1932, § 8633; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1701.

Cross-References. Advancement on docket of cases involving state, §20-8-106.

Payment of costs, §20-12-134.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 123.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Judgments and Appeal, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 373.

Comparative Legislation. Actions by and against state:

Ala. Code §6-5-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-106-101.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §§9-10-2,45-12-26.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 15.060.

Miss. Code Ann. §11-45-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. §§ 27.050, 27.060.

N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 143-300.14, 147-89.

Va. Code § 8.01-192 et seq.

Cited: State ex rel. Estes v. Persica, 130 Tenn. 48, 168 S.W. 1056, 1914 Tenn. LEXIS 3 (1914).

20-13-102. Actions against state prohibited.

No court in the state shall have any power, jurisdiction or authority to entertain any suit against the state, or against any officer of the state acting by authority of the state, with a view to reach the state, its treasury, funds or property, and all such suits shall be dismissed as to the state or such officers, on motion, plea or demurrer of the law officer of the state, or counsel employed for the state.

No statutory or other provision authorizing the University of Tennessee and its board of trustees to sue and be sued shall constitute a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Acts 1873, ch. 13, § 2; Shan., § 4507; Code 1932, § 8634; Acts 1977, ch. 170, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1702.

Cross-References. Sovereign immunity of state in comparative fault litigation, §20-1-199. s

Personal service on the state or any agency thereof, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 4.04(8).

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 84.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, §§ 140, 144; 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 12; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, §§ 13, 14, 25; 22 Tenn. Juris., State, §§ 13, 14.

Law Reviews.

Bivens-type Actions Under State Constitutions — Will Tennessee Give You a Remedy?, 30 U. Mem. L. Rev. 409 (2000).

Claims Against States, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 234.

Claims Against the State in Tennessee — The Board of Claims, 4 Vand. L. Rev. 875.

Policing the Police: Clarifying the Test for Holding the Government Liable Under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 and the State-Created Danger Theory, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 165 (2001).

Sovereign Immunity and the Tennessee Governmental Tort Liability Act (John C. Cook), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 885.

States — Suits Against State Officers, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

Tort Liability of Public Officers in Tennessee, 21 Tenn. L. Rev. 306.

Torts — Hurd v. Woolfork: The Public Duty Doctrine in Tennessee, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1279 (1998).

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

Attorney General Opinions. The Uniform Trade Secrets Act does not authorize an action for civil remedies against the state or state employees; the doctrine of sovereign immunity dictates that a lawsuit brought under the Uniform Trade Secrets Act against the state or a state employee would be barred, OAG 00-115 (6/27/00).

Neither T.C.A. §68-201-115 nor any other provision of the Tennessee Air Quality Act waives sovereign immunity by explicitly making state agencies subject to qualified local air pollution control programs. The Tennessee Air Pollution Control Board does not have the authority to waive the state’s sovereign immunity as that authority is reserved solely to the General Assembly. OAG 10-86, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 92 (7/13/10).

20-13-103. Compromise and settlement of litigation.

The attorney general and reporter may compromise and settle, insofar as the state is concerned, any civil litigation to which the state may be a party, upon such terms as in the attorney general and reporter's opinion may seem to be in the best interest of the state, and may enter into such agreements in connection with the compromise and settlement as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section. Written approval of the comptroller of the treasury and governor shall be required for any compromise and settlement greater than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The attorney general and reporter shall submit a report quarterly to the comptroller of the treasury and governor of all compromises and settlements made without the written approval of the comptroller of the treasury and governor. The written approval of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, the comptroller of the treasury and governor, shall be also required for the compromise and settlement of such civil litigation to which the state may be a party if the compromise and settlement will result in a significant increase in state expenditures, affect the bond rating of the state or result in a decision on a policy issue that may result in a significant increase in state expenditures.

Acts 1933, ch. 78, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1703; Acts 1986, ch. 728, § 1; 2012, ch. 637, § 1.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment deleted “, with the written approval of the governor and the comptroller of the treasury,” following “attorney general and reporter” and substituted “attorney general’s” for “their” in the first sentence; added the second and third sentences; and inserted “, the comptroller of the treasury and governor,” in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 637, § 2. March 30, 2012.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Compromise and Settlement, § 2.

Collateral References.

Attorney's authority to compromise action — modern cases. 66 A.L.R. 119, 30 A.L.R.2d 944.

States
179.

20-13-104. Order for deposit in treasury.

In all suits brought by the state, where it is made to appear, to the satisfaction of the chancellor or judge before whom the same is pending, that any funds, moneys, bonds, notes, coupons or securities are held by any person as agent, depository or trustee, either for the state or for any of the parties against whom the suit is pending, and the litigation involves the question as to which party is entitled to the ownership or possession of the fund, or the terms on which it shall be taken by the state, it shall be the duty of the court, judge or chancellor, in open court or at chambers, in term or in vacation, to order and direct that the fund be deposited in the treasury for safekeeping, which order the court, judge or chancellor shall proceed to enforce by process of attachment against the person, or by such other writ, process, orders or agency as may be adequate to the purpose.

Acts 1873, ch. 78, § 1; Shan., § 4508; mod. Code 1932, § 8635; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1704.

Collateral References. States
75, 122.

20-13-105. Appeal from deposit order.

No appeal shall lie from any deposit order until after it has been fully complied with, nor shall any supersedeas be granted therein until after the deposit order is fully complied with.

Acts 1873, ch. 78, § 1; Shan., § 4509; Code 1932, § 8636; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1705.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 31.

20-13-106. Safekeeping of deposited securities.

The court, judge or chancellor shall make such order as the court, judge or chancellor deems necessary for the safekeeping or cancellation and redelivery or appropriation of the securities so deposited.

Acts 1873, ch. 78, § 2; Shan., § 4510; Code 1932, § 8637; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1706.

20-13-107. Return of deposited property.

Where moneys are deposited in the state treasury under the provisions of this chapter, the court shall have power, in the event the right to the moneys are adjudged against the state, to order the return of the moneys to the party entitled, and the moneys shall be paid out of the treasury without any delay, and in exclusion of all other claims whatever.

Acts 1873, ch. 78, § 3; Shan., § 4511; Code 1932, § 8638; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1707.

Collateral References. States
89.

20-13-108. Methods of deposit and withdrawal.

The funds or securities shall be placed in the state treasury, and drawn from the state treasury on warrants of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1873, ch. 78, § 4; Shan., § 4512; Code 1932, § 8639; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1708.

20-13-109. Tax recovery by other states.

Any state of the United States or the political subdivisions of any state shall have the right to sue in the courts of this state to recover any tax that may be owing to it when the like right is accorded to this state and its political subdivisions by such state.

Acts 1949, ch. 157, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8639.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1709.

Law Reviews.

Symposium State Taxation of Interstate Business — Out-of-State Collection of State and Local Taxes (Robert A. Leflar), 29 Vand. L. Rev. 443.

Cited: United States Steel Corp. v. Multistate Tax Comm'n, 434 U.S. 452, 98 S. Ct. 799, 54 L. Ed. 2d 682, 1978 U.S. LEXIS 58 (1978).

20-13-110. Venue for real property lien action against state.

Venue for any suit against the state relative to a lien on real property shall be in the county in which the property is located.

Acts 1986, ch. 799, § 1.